District of Columbia statutes.
31-914

Failure to give notice.

If the mutual company complies substantially and in good faith with the notice requirements of this chapter, the mutual company’s failure to give any member or members any required notice does not impair the validity of any action taken under this chapter.

History

May 24, 1996, D.C. Law 11-126, § 15, 43 DCR 1551

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-4214.